src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON PostAdv-Infl

+Post+Adv: # ;


LEXICON Adv

+Adv: # ;


LEXICON Postadverbs

ч:ч PostAdv-Infl ; ! "not any"
хамт:хамт PostAdv-Infl ; ! "together"
биш:биш PostAdv-Infl ; ! "not"
л:л PostAdv-Infl ; ! "only"


LEXICON Adverbs

сайн:сайн Adv ; ! "well"
их:их Adv ; ! "very"
дахин:дахин Adv ; ! "again"
одоо:ороо Adv ; ! "now"
сая:сая Adv ; ! "just now"
мөн:мөн Adv ; ! "right, truly"
ягаад:ягаад Adv ; ! "why"
тийм:тийм Adv ; ! "in such a way"
илүү:илүү Adv ; ! "rather"
маргааш:маргааш Adv ; ! "tomorrow"
өнөөдөр:өнөөдөр Adv ; ! "today"
өчигдөр:өчигдөр Adv ; ! "yesterday"
хамгийн:хамгийн Adv ; ! "most"
бүхий:бүхий Adv ; ! "entirely, fully"
маш:маш Adv ; ! "very (with other adv)"
